Florida, session 2026, SB60.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âParagraph (m) of subsection (1) of section 14 121.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 15 121.055âSenior Management Service Class.âThere is hereby 16 established a separate class of membership within the Florida 17 Retirement System to be known as the âSenior Management Service 18 Class,â which shall become effective February 1, 1987. 19 (1) 20 (m)1.âEffective July 1, 2020, participation in the Senior 21 Management Service Class is compulsory for each appointed 22 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel and each districtâs 23 assistant regional counsel chiefs, administrative directors, and 24 chief investigators. 25 2.âEffective July 1, 2026, participation in the Senior 26 Management Service Class is compulsory for each regionâs 27 assistant regional counsel supervisors (class code 9903). 28 3.âA Senior Management Service Class member under this 29 paragraph may purchase additional retirement credit in the class 30 for creditable service within the purview of the Senior 31 Management Service Class retroactive to October 1, 2007, and may 32 upgrade retirement credit for such service in accordance with 33 paragraph (j). However, this service credit may not be purchased 34 by the employer on behalf of the member. 35 Section 2.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of 36 $950,000 in recurring funds is appropriated from the General 37 Revenue Fund to the offices of the criminal conflict and civil 38 regional counsel for the purpose of paying retirement benefits 39 for specified positions within those offices. 40 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.